Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 31-25-39.
Resolution of Board authorizing or relating to issuance of bonds; contracts.

In any resolution of the board of the bank authorizing, or relating to the issuance of any bonds, the board, in order to secure the payment of the bonds and in addition to its other powers, may covenant and contract with the holders of the bonds:

To pledge to any payment or purpose all or any part of its revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence, and the moneys derived therefrom, and the proceeds of any bonds including, but not limited to, any or all municipal securities held by the bank. Any such bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grants, subsidies, contributions, or other funds or moneys from the United States or the state or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or any other governmental unit;

To covenant against pledging all or any part of its revenues, or against permitting or suffering any lien on those revenues or its property;

To pledge all or any part of the assets of the bank to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue of notes or bonds, subject to such agreements with holders of bonds as may then exist;

To covenant as to the use and disposition of any payments of principal or interest received by the bank on municipal securities or other investments held by the bank;

To covenant as to establishment of reserves or sinking funds, the making of provision for them and the regulation and disposition thereof;

To covenant with respect to or against limitations on any right to sell or otherwise dispose of any property of any kind;

To covenant as to any bonds to be issued by the bank, or by the local governmental unit the municipal securities of which are being purchased with the proceeds of an issue of bonds or notes of the bank, and their limitations and their terms and conditions and as to the custody, application and disposition of their proceeds, and pledging such proceeds to secure payment of bonds or any issue thereof;

To contract with bond or note holders respecting the terms and conditions of agreements with the state or local governmental units made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

To covenant as to the issuance of additional bonds or as to limitations on the issuance of additional bonds and on the incurring of other debts;

To covenant as to the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds, as to the sources and methods of payment, as to the rank or priority of any bonds with respect to any lien of security or as to the acceleration of the maturity of any bonds;

To provide for the replacement of lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated bonds;

To covenant against extending the time for the payment of bonds or interest thereon;

To covenant as to the redemption of bonds and privileges of exchange thereof for the other bonds of the bank;

To covenant as to any charges to be established and charged, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by charges or other revenues and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof;

To limit the amount of money to be expended by the bank for operating expenses of the bank;

To covenant to create or authorize the creation of special funds or moneys to be held in pledge or otherwise for operating expenses, payment or redemption of bonds, reserves or other purposes and as to the use and disposition of the moneys held in those funds;

To establish the procedures, if any, by which the terms of any contract or covenant with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which the consent may be given;

To covenant as to the custody of any of its properties or investments, the safekeeping thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance moneys;

To covenant as to the time and manner of enforcement or restraint from enforcement of any rights of the bank arising by reason of or with respect to nonpayment of principal or interest of any municipal securities;

To provide for the rights and liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach of any covenant, condition or obligation and to prescribe the events of default and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds or other obligations of the bank shall become or may be declared due and payable before maturity and the terms and conditions upon which the declaration and its consequences may be waived or rescinded;

To vest in a trustee or trustees within or without the state such property, rights, powers and duties of any trustee as the bank may determine, which may include any of the rights, powers and duties of any trustee appointed by the holders of any bonds and to limit or abrogate the right of the holders of any bonds of the bank to appoint a trustee under this chapter or limiting the rights, powers and duties of the trustee;

To pay the costs or expenses incident to the enforcement of the bonds or of the resolution or of any covenant or agreement of the bank with the holders of its bonds;

To agree with any corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state, as to the pledging or assigning of any revenues or funds to which the bank has any rights or interest, and may further provide for such other rights and remedies exercisable by the trustee as may be proper for the protection of the holders of any bonds of the bank and not otherwise in violation of law, and which agreement may provide for the restriction of the rights of any individual holder of bonds of the bank;

To appoint and to provide for the duties and obligations of a paying agent or paying agents, or such other fiduciaries as the resolution may provide within or without the state;

To limit the rights of the holders of any bonds to enforce any pledge or covenant securing bonds;

To fix, or agree to fix such asset coverage or other ratios with respect to the security of its bonds and notes as the bank may deem prudent or otherwise advisable; and

To make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants herein expressly authorized, of like or different character, and to make covenants to do or refrain from doing such things as may be necessary, or covenant and desirable, in order better to secure bonds or which, in the absolute discretion of the bank, will tend to make bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that the covenants or things may not be enumerated herein.

In the discretion of the bank, the bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the bank and a corporate trustee. Such trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the bank in relation to the exercise of its corporate powers and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. The bank may provide by such trust indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the bonds and revenues to the trustee under such trust indenture or other depository, and for the method of disbursement thereof with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated as a part of the operating expenses of the bank. If the bonds shall be secured by a trust indenture, the bondholders shall not have the right to appoint a separate trustee to represent them.

Bonds issued by the bank under Section 31-25-21(k) for the purposes provided in Section 31-25-20(g) shall be general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged. If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this paragraph.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 20; Laws, 1997, ch. 302, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved February 24, 1997).

§ 31-25-41.
Pledge of revenues or other moneys.

Any pledge of revenues or other moneys made by the bank shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the bank shall immediately be subject thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created or any statement with respect thereto need be filed or recorded, except in the records of the bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-43.
Establishment of funds or accounts.

The bank may establish such funds or accounts as may be, in its discretion, necessary or desirable to further the accomplishment of the purposes of the bank or to comply with the provisions of any agreement made by or any resolution of the bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-45.
Purchase of bonds by Bank.

The bank, subject to such agreements with bondholders as may then exist, shall have power out of any funds available therefor to purchase bonds of the bank, which shall thereupon be cancelled, at a price or prices as shall be determined by the bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-47.
Agreements or contracts for safekeeping of municipal bonds or other investments.

The bank may enter into agreements or contracts with any bank, trust companies, banking or financial institutions within or without the state as may be necessary, desirable or convenient in the opinion of the bank for rendering services to the bank in connection with the care, custody or safekeeping of municipal bonds or other investments held or owned by the bank and services in connection with the payment or collection of amounts payable as to principal or interest, and for services in connection with the delivery to the bank of municipal bonds or other investments purchased by it or sold by it, and to pay the cost of those services. The bank may also, in connection with any of the services to be rendered by any banks, trust companies or banking or financial institutions as to the custody and safekeeping of any of its municipal bonds or investments, require security in the form of collateral bonds, surety agreements or security agreements in such form and amount as, in the opinion of the bank, is necessary or desirable for the purpose of the bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-49.
Reservation of State power.

The state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds issued by the bank under this act that the state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the bank to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the said holders thereof or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such holders until such bonds, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met and discharged. The bank is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with the holders of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-51.
Bonds of bank as legal investments; authorized investments by bank.

The bonds of the bank shall be legal investments in which all public officers and public bodies of this state, its political subdivisions, all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations, trust companies, savings banks and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them. The notes and bonds are also hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by all public officers and bodies of the state or any agency or political subdivisions of the state and all municipalities and public corporations for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, to invest money of the bank, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds, notes, any securities or certificates of participation:

In obligations of any municipality or the state or the United States of America;

In obligations the principal and interest of which are guaranteed by the state or the United States of America;

In obligations of any corporation wholly owned by the United States of America;

In obligations of any corporation sponsored by the United States of America which is, or may become, eligible as collateral for advances to member banks as determined by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System;

In obligations of insurance firms or other corporations whose investments are rated “AA” or better by recognized rating companies;

In certificates of deposit or time deposits of qualified depositories of the state as approved by the State Depository Commission, secured in such manner, if any, as the corporation shall determine;

In contracts for the purchase and sale of obligations of the type specified in items (a) through (e) above;

In repurchase agreements secured by obligations specified in items (a) through (e) above; and

In money market funds, the assets of which are required to be invested in obligations specified in items (a) through (f) above.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 26; Laws, 1992, ch. 481 § 6; Laws, 2003, ch. 328, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 7, 2003).

§ 31-25-53.
Chapter provisions as cumulative.

Neither this act nor anything herein contained is or shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the bank might otherwise have under any laws of this state, and this act is cumulative to any such powers. This act does and shall be construed to provide complete additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds, notes and other obligations or any instrument as security therefor, except as in this act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).

§ 31-25-55.
Savings clause.

If any section, subsection, paragraph, sentence, clause or provision of this act shall be unconstitutional or ineffective, in whole or in part, to the extent that it is not unconstitutional or ineffective, it shall be valid and effective and no other section, subdivision, paragraph, sentence, clause or provision shall on account thereof be deemed invalid or ineffective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 455, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1986).